Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB440.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "project facility," "qualified taxpayer" and "semiconductor manufacturing" in section 1771-L of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1771-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Early-stage semiconductor business." A business with less than $10,000,000 in revenue in the areas of research or design of semiconductor materials, semiconductor devices or semiconductor packaging and testing."Project facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth which is owned and operated by [the] a qualified taxpayer and where semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research is conducted by [the] a qualified taxpayer at the project facility."Qualified taxpayer." [A company that satisfies all of the following:(1) Conducts semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research in this Commonwealth at a project facility in this Commonwealth that has been placed in service on or after the effective date of this section.(2) Has made a capital investment of at least $200,000,000 in order to construct the project facility and place the project facility into service in this Commonwealth.(3) Has created a minimum aggregate total of 800 permanent jobs.(4) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractors or subcontractors to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction of the project facility.(5) Has demonstrated that the new jobs created at the project facility or for work covered by Subarticle F are paid at least the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for 20250SB0440PN0466 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(6) The construction work to place a project facility into service shall be performed subject to the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act.] A company that either:(1) is an early-stage semiconductor business; or(2) satisfies all of the following:(i) Conducts semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research in this Commonwealth at a project facility in this Commonwealth that has been placed in service on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(ii) Has made a capital investment of at least $20,000,000 in order to construct the project facility and place the project facility into service in this Commonwealth.(iii) Has created or retained a minimum aggregate total of 100 permanent jobs.(iv) Has made good faith efforts to recruit and employ, and to encourage any contractor or subcontractor to recruit and employ, workers from the local labor market for employment during the construction of the project facility.(v) Has demonstrated that the new jobs created at the project facility or for work covered by Subarticle F are paid at least the prevailing minimum wage and benefit rates for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(vi) The construction work to place a project 20250SB0440PN0466 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facility into service is subject to the act of March 3, 1978 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Steel Products Procurement Act."Semiconductor manufacturing." [The manufacture of components or the creation of advanced processes or technology within the semiconductor manufacturing and related equipment and material supplier sector.] As follows:(1) Any of the following activities:(i) the manufacturing of components;(ii) the creation of advanced processes or technology; or(iii) advanced testing and packaging of components, in each case within the semiconductor manufacturing and related equipment and material supplier.(2) The term includes research or design of semiconductor materials, semiconductor devices or semiconductor packaging and testing.Section 2. Sections 1772-L, 1773-L and 1776-L(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 1772-L. Eligibility.In order to be eligible to receive a tax credit, a company shall demonstrate the following:(1) The company meets the requirements of a qualified taxpayer.(2) Confirmation that the company has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined by assessment or determination by the department and not under timely appeal.(3) If the applicant is an early-stage semiconductor 20250SB0440PN0466 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business, the applicant must have at least $3,000,000 in research and development investment during the previous year.Section 1773-L. Application and approval of tax credit.(a) Determination of tax credit amount.--The annual tax credit amount may be determined based upon any one or more of the following:(1) No more than 2.5% of the capital investment.(2) No more than 100% of tax withheld from employees and paid under Article III or $20,000, whichever is less, for each created or retained permanent job at the project facility.(b) Application.--(1) A qualified taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit under this section.(2) The application must be submitted to the department by March 1 for the tax credit claimed for semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research conducted by the qualified taxpayer at [the] a project facility during the prior calendar year.(3) The application must be on the form required by the department which shall include the following:(i) information required by the department to document the semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research conducted at [the] a project facility;(ii) information required by the department to verify that the applicant is a qualified taxpayer; and(iii) any other information as the department deems appropriate.(c) Review and approval.--20250SB0440PN0466 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The department shall review the applications and shall issue an approval or disapproval by May 1.(2) Upon approval, the department shall issue a certificate stating the amount of the tax credit granted for semiconductor manufacturing, biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research conducted at [the] a project facility in the prior calendar year.(d) Availability of tax credits.--(1) Each fiscal year, $20,000,000 in tax credits shall be made available to the department in accordance with this subarticle.(2) The department shall issue [up to $10,000,000] a minimum of $1,000,000 in a fiscal year to [the qualified taxpayer] qualified taxpayers engaged in semiconductor manufacturing [which first meets] that first meet the qualifications to receive a tax credit under this subarticle. The department may not issue more than $8,000,000 in aggregate tax credits in a year under this paragraph.(3) The department shall issue [up to $10,000,000] a minimum of $1,000,000 in a fiscal year to [the qualified taxpayer] qualified taxpayers engaged in biomedical manufacturing or biomedical research [which first meets] that first meet the qualifications to receive a tax credit under this subarticle.(3.1) The department shall issue a minimum of $100,000 in a fiscal year to early-stage semiconductor businesses that first meet the qualifications to receive a tax credit under this subarticle. An early-stage semiconductor business may not receive more than $1,000,000 in any fiscal year and the award may be for up to five years. The department may not 20250SB0440PN0466 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issue more than $2,000,000 in aggregate tax credits in a year under this paragraph.(4) An amount under paragraph (1) which remains unallocated under paragraph (2) or (3) after the issuance of credits under paragraph (3.1) shall be issued to the qualified taxpayer which next meets the qualifications to receive a tax credit under this subarticle.(5) The total aggregate amount of tax credits awarded to a qualified taxpayer under this subarticle may not exceed 25% of the capital investment made to construct a project facility.Section 1776-L. Sale or assignment.(a) Authorization.--If [the] a qualified taxpayer holds a tax credit through the end of the calendar year in which the tax credit was granted, the qualified taxpayer may sell or assign a tax credit, in whole or in part, provided the sale is effective by the close of the following calendar year.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0440PN0466 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819